Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3401
Legislative intent.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a decisionmaking process which allows a competent adult to designate another person to make health care and medical treatment decisions if the adult becomes incapable of making such decisions.

(2) The Legislature does not intend to encourage or discourage any particular health care or treatment decision or to create any new right or alter any existing right of competent adults to make such decisions, but the Legislature does intend through sections 30-3401 to 30-3432 to allow an adult to exercise rights he or she already possesses by means of delegation of decisionmaking authority to a designated attorney in fact.

(3) Sections 30-3401 to 30-3432 shall not confer any new rights regarding the provision or rejection of any specific medical treatment and shall not alter any existing laws concerning homicide, suicide, or assisted suicide. Nothing in sections 30-3401 to 30-3432 shall be construed to condone, authorize, or approve homicide, suicide, or assisted suicide.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 1.